apertium-de-nl.de.dix
    <pardef n="Zeitung__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Fahrr/ad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ade</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ades</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ads</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äder</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ädern</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äder</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äder</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Computer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Frau__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Schule__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mädchen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S/atz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atz</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atz</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atzes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ätze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ätzen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ätze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ätze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Tante"><i>Tante</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Familie"><i>Familie</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dame"><i>Dame</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Straße"><i>Straße</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Woche"><i>Woche</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Blume"><i>Blume</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Katze"><i>Katze</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tasse"><i>Tasse</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schwester"><i>Schwester</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schule"><i>Schule</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Minute"><i>Minute</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Stunde"><i>Stunde</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Insel"><i>Insel</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Frage"><i>Frage</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gruppe"><i>Gruppe</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kirche"><i>Kirche</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kirsche"><i>Kirsche</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kette"><i>Kette</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Puppe"><i>Puppe</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Karte"><i>Karte</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Marke"><i>Marke</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e c="TODO check pardef" lm="Rübe"><i>Rübe</i><par n="Schule__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Frau"><i>Frau</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Universität"><i>Universität</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Antwort"><i>Antwort</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tür"><i>Tür</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fabrik"><i>Fabrik</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="National"><i>National</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Autobahn"><i>Autobahn</i><par n="Zeitung__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zeit"><i>Zeit</i><par n="Zeitung__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zeitung"><i>Zeitung</i><par n="Zeitung__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fahrrad"><i>Fahrr</i><par n="Fahrr/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Computer"><i>Computer</i><par n="Computer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mädchen"><i>Mädchen</i><par n="Mädchen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Satz"><i>Satz</i><par n="S/atz__n"/></e>
